New Jersey, session 222, A1957.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   The Department of Law and Public Safety shall develop or identify training course materials and an online tutorial regarding appropriate recognition and response techniques concerning the interaction of law enforcement officers with the hearing impaired, including, but not limited to, a hearing impaired persons right to the assistance of a qualified interpreter pursuant to P.L.1983, c.564 (C.34:1-69.7 et seq.). b.    The Department of Law and Public Safety shall cause the training course materials and online tutorial developed or identified pursuant to subsection a. of this section to be made available to every State, county, and municipal law enforcement department in the State and to each campus police department at an institution of higher education in the State that appoints police officers pursuant to P.L.1970, c.211 (C.18A:6-4.2 et seq.) for use in providing officer training. c.    The Department of Law and Public Safety shall periodically assess the training course materials and online tutorial developed or identified pursuant to subsection a. of this section and update them where the department finds appropriate. d.    Every State, county, and municipal law enforcement department in the State and every campus police department at an institution of higher education in the State that appoints police officers pursuant to P.L.1970, c.211 (C.18A:6-4.2 et seq.) shall provide annual in-service training of its personnel utilizing the training course materials or online tutorial developed or identified by the Department of Law and Public Safety pursuant to subsection a. of this section. e.    Every State, county, and municipal law enforcement department in the State and every campus police department at an institution of higher education in the State that appoints police officers pursuant to P.L.1970, c.211 (C.18A:6-4.2 et seq.) shall contract with an agency that is capable of providing a qualified interpreter within two hours of a request. As used in this act: Hearing impaired person shall have the same meaning as in section 2 of P.L.1983, c.564 (C.34:1-69.8). Qualified interpreter shall have the same meaning as in section 2 of P.L.1983, c.564 (C.34:1-69.8). 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month following enactment.